Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-228
Concurrent jurisdiction; watercourse, defined.

Any depression or draw two feet or more below the surrounding lands and having a continuous outlet to a stream of water, or river or brook shall be deemed a watercourse.

Laws 1965, c. 156, § 2, p. 502.